District of Columbia statutes.
16-1152

Order to produce life tenant; service of order.

Upon the presentation of the petition and affidavit prescribed by section 16-1151 , the court shall issue an order to the person named in the petition to produce and show to the persons named in the order by the petitioner not exceeding two in number, at such time and place as the court directs, the person upon whose life the prior estate depends. A certified copy of the order shall be served upon the person required to produce the tenant for life in the manner provided by applicable rules of court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1153.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1152.
1973 Ed., § 16-1152.